Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.150

Accounting procedures.

The chief administrative law judge shall keep such records as are necessary to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.

[ 1982 c 189 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 189: See note following RCW 34.12.020.